Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB518.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 186 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Transportation Cabinet shall expand the availability of driver licensing
services by setting up a system in which the circuit clerk in each county shall
issue operator's licenses and personal identification cards for residents of that
county.
(2) The Transportation Cabinet shall purchase and install all equipment and
hardware necessary for each circuit clerk to begin performing driver licensing
services.
(3) The fees prescribed by Section 2 of this Act shall apply and the circuit clerk shall
retain twenty-five percent (25%) from the portion of the fees directed to the
license fund for each document request processed.
Section 2. KRS 186.531 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "GF" means the general fund;
(b) "IP" means instruction permit;
(c) "License fund" or "LF" means the KYTC photo license account created in
KRS 174.056;
(d) "MC" means motorcycle;
(e) "MC fund" or "MCF" means the motorcycle safety education program fund
established in KRS 176.5065;
(f) "OL" means operator's license; and
(g) "PIDC" means personal identification card.
(2) The fees imposed for voluntary travel ID operator's licenses, instruction permits,
and personal identification cards shall be as follows. The fees received shall be
Page 1 of 5
XXXX 2/13/2025 10:23 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1762
distributed as shown in the table. The fees shown, unless otherwise noted, are for an
eight (8) year period:
Card Type Fee LF GF MCF
OL (initial/renewal) $48 $48 $0 $0
OL (Under 21) (Up to 4 years) $18 $18 $0 $0
Any OL, MC, or combination
(duplicate/corrected) $15 $13.25 $1.75 $0
Motor vehicle IP (3 years) $18 $16 $2 $0
Motorcycle IP (1 year) $18 $13 $1 $4
Motorcycle OL (initial/renewal) $48 $38 $0 $10
Combination vehicle/MC OL
(initial/renewal) $58 $48 $0 $10
PIDC (initial/renewal) $28 $25 $3 $0
PIDC (duplicate/corrected) $15 $13.50 $1.50 $0
(3) Except as provided in subsection (10) of this section, the fees imposed for standard
operator's licenses, instruction permits, and personal identification cards shall be as
follows and, unless otherwise noted, are for an eight (8) year period:
Card Type Fee LF GF MCF
OL (initial/renewal) $43 $43 $0 $0
OL (Under 21) (Up to 4 years) $15 $15 $0 $0
Any OL, MC, or combination
(duplicate/corrected) $15 $13.25 $1.75 $0
Motor vehicle IP (3 years) $15 $13 $2 $0
Motorcycle IP (1 year) $15 $10 $1 $4
Motorcycle OL (initial/renewal) $43 $33 $0 $10
Combination vehicle/MC OL
(initial/renewal) $53 $43 $0 $10
Page 2 of 5
XXXX 2/13/2025 10:23 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1762
PIDC (initial/renewal) $23 $20 $3 $0
PIDC (duplicate/corrected) $15 $13.50 $1.50 $0
PIDC (no fixed address) under
KRS 186.4122(5)/186.4123(5)
(initial, duplicate, or corrected) $0 $0 $0 $0
(4) The fee for a four (4) year original or renewal license issued pursuant to KRS
186.4101 shall be fifty percent (50%) of the amount shown in subsections (2) and
(3) of this section. The distribution of fees shown in subsections (2) and (3) of this
section shall also be reduced by fifty percent (50%) for licenses that are issued for
four (4) years.
(5) Any fee for any identity document applied for using alternative technology under
KRS 186.410 and 186.4122 shall be distributed in the same manner as a document
applied for in person with the cabinet.
(6) (a) An applicant for an original or renewal operator's license, permit, commercial
driver's license, motorcycle operator's license, or personal identification card
shall be requested by the cabinet to make a donation to promote an organ
donor program.
(b) The donation under this subsection shall be added to the regular fee for an
original or renewal motor vehicle operator's license, permit, commercial
driver's license, motorcycle operator's license, or personal identification card.
One (1) donation may be made per issuance or renewal of a license or any
combination thereof.
(c) The fee shall be paid to the cabinet and shall be forwarded by the cabinet on a
monthly basis to the Kentucky Circuit Court Clerks' Trust for Life, and such
moneys are hereby appropriated to be used exclusively for the purpose of
promoting an organ donor program. A donation under this subsection shall be
voluntary and may be refused by the applicant at the time of issuance or
Page 3 of 5
XXXX 2/13/2025 10:23 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1762
renewal.
(7) In addition to the fees outlined in this section, the following individuals, upon
application for an initial or renewal operator's license, instruction permit, or
personal identification card, shall pay an additional application fee of thirty dollars
($30), which shall be deposited in the photo license account:
(a) An applicant who is not a United States citizen or permanent resident and who
applies under KRS 186.4121 or 186.4123; or
(b) An applicant who is applying for a instruction permit, operator's license, or
personal identification card without a photo under KRS 186.4102(9).
(8) (a) Except for individuals exempted under paragraph (c) of this subsection, an
applicant for relicensing after revocation or suspension shall pay a
reinstatement fee of forty dollars ($40).
(b) The reinstatement fee under this subsection shall be distributed by the State
Treasurer as follows:
1. Thirty-five dollars ($35) shall be deposited into the photo license
account; and
2. Five dollars ($5) shall be deposited into a trust and agency fund to be
used in defraying the costs and expenses of administering a driver
improvement program for problem drivers.
(c) This subsection shall not apply to:
1. Any person whose license was suspended for failure to meet the
conditions set out in KRS 186.411 when, within one (1) year of
suspension, the driving privileges of the individual are reinstated; or
2. A student who has had his or her license revoked pursuant to KRS
159.051.
(9) As payment for any fee identified in this section, the cabinet:
(a) Shall accept cash and personal checks;
Page 4 of 5
XXXX 2/13/2025 10:23 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1762
(b) May accept other methods of payment in accordance with KRS 45.345; and
(c) May enter into billing agreements with homeless shelters, health care
facilities, or social service agencies that serve individuals without an
established and fixed nighttime residence of regular return.
(10) There shall be no fee assessed for the initial, renewal, or duplicate standard personal
identification card to an individual, if the individual:
(a) Does not possess a valid operator's license or a commercial driver's license;
and
(b) Is at least eighteen (18) years of age on or before the next regular election.
(11) For any document issued by a circuit clerk in accordance with Section 1 of this
Act, the circuit clerk shall retain twenty-five percent (25%) from the portion of
the fees imposed by this section that are directed to the license fund.
Section 3. This Act takes effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
XXXX 2/13/2025 10:23 AM Jacketed